Connecticut, session 2026, SB00446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Connecticut Advisory
Commission on Intergovernmental Relations established pursuant to
section 2-79a of the general statutes shall conduct a study concerning
the feasibility of authorizing municipalities that have entered into
revenue sharing agreements pursuant to section 7-148bb of the general
statutes to adopt differential mill rates applicable to taxable real
property for which the tax revenues are shared pursuant to such
agreements. Not later than January 1, 2027, the commission shall submit
a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to planning and development.
Such report shall include the findings of such study and any legislative
recommendations to authorize such municipalities to adopt such
differential mill rates.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 446
Section 1 from passage New section
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2